en: Artisanal production, Artisinal
es: Fabricación artesanal, Producción artesanal
fr: Fabrication artisanale
nl: Ambachtelijke productie
pt: Fabrico artesanal, produção astezanal

en: Farm production, produced on the farm
fr: Fabrication à la ferme
nl: Geproduceerd op de boerderij

fr: Savourez l'Alsace
nl: Proef de Elzas

xx: Avainlippu
en: Key Flag Symbol, Finnish Work’s Key Flag Symbol, Key Flag
fi: Avainlippu
sv: Nyckelflaggan

xx: Sydänmerkki, Parempi valinta, Bättre val
en: Heart Symbol
fi: Sydänmerkki, Parempi valinta
sv: Hjärtmärket, Bättre val

en: High in salt - Finland
fi: Voimakassuolainen, Sisältää paljon suolaa
sv: Kraftigt saltat, Innehåller mycket salt

en: natural co2
fr: co2 naturel
hr: prirodni co2
si: naravni co2

en: natural colorings
ca: Colorants naturals
de: natürliche Farbstoffe
es: Colorantes naturales
fi: Luontaisia väriaineita
fr: colorants naturels, colorant naturel, colorant d'origine naturelle, colorants d'origine naturelle
he: צבעי מאכל טבעיים
hu: természetes színezék
it: Coloranti naturali
nl: Natuurlijke kleurstoffen
pt: Corantes naturais, corante natural
sv: naturligt färgande livsmedel
th: ใช้สีธรรมชาติ

en: natural flavors
ca: Aromes naturals
de: natürliche Aromen
es: Aromas naturales
fi: Luontaisia aromeja
fr: arômes naturels, arôme naturel, Aux arômes naturels
he: חומרי טעם טבעיים
hr: prirodne arome
hu: természetes aromák
it: Aromi naturali
nl: Natuurlijke aromas
pl: aromat naturalny
pt: Sabores naturais, aromas naturais, aroma natural

en: Never frozen
ca: No congelar mai
de: Nie gefroren
es: Nunca congelado
fi: ei ole koskaan pakastettu
fr: Jamais congelé, Garanti jamais congelé
he: לא הוקפא מעולם
hu: Nem volt fagyasztva
it: Mai congelato
nl: Nooit bevroren
pt: Nunca congelar, nuca congele

en: Unfrozen
ca: Sense congelar
de: Aufgetaut
fi: sulatettu
fr: Décongelé, Produit décongelé, produits décongelés, Ingrédient décongelé, Ingrédients décongelés, Mise en oeuvre d'ingrédients décongelés, peut contenir des ingrédients décongelés
it: Non surgelato
pt: Descongelado, desgongelada

en: Do not freeze
ca: No refrigerar
de: Nicht einfrieren
es: No congelar
fi: Ei saa pakastaa
fr: Ne pas congeler
he: אסור להקפיא
hr: ne smrzavati
hu: Tilos fagyasztani
it: Non surgelare
nl: Niet invriezen
pl: Nie zamrażać
pt: Não congele, não congelar

en: Do not freeze again
ca: No tornar a congelar
da: Må ikke nedfryses igen, Må ikke nedfryses igen efter optøning
de: Nicht wieder einfrieren
es: No volver a congelar, No congelar de nuevo
fi: ei saa pakastaa uudelleen, sulanutta tuotetta ei saa pakastaa uudelleen
fr: Ne pas recongeler, Ne jamais recongeler un produit décongelé
he: אין להקפיא בשנית, אין להקפיא שוב, אין להפשיר ואז להקפיא, אין להפשיר ולהקפיא
hu: Tilos újrafagyasztani
it: Non surgelare nuovamente
nl: Niet opnieuw invriezen
pl: Nie zamrażać ponownie
pt: Não congelar novamente, não tornar a congelar, não congele novamente, não torne a congelar

en: Some ingredients not from Italy, Some ingredients of this product do not come from Italy
de: einige Zutaten stammen nicht aus Italien
fi: osa ainesosista ei Italiasta
fr: Certains ingrédients ne proviennent pas d'Italie, Certains ingrédients de ce produit ne proviennent pas d'Italie
it: Alcuni ingredienti non provengono dall'Italia

en: refrigerated
de: gekühlt
es: refrigerado
fr: réfrigeré
it: refrigerato
nl: gekoeld, gekoelde producten

en: Some ingredients not from France, Some ingredients of this product do not come from France
ca: Alguns ingredients no són de França
de: Einige Zutaten nicht aus Frankreich
fi: Osa ainesosista ei Ranskasta
fr: Certains ingrédients ne proviennent pas de France, Certains ingrédients de ce produit ne proviennent pas de France
it: Alcuni ingredienti non provengono dalla Francia

en: Without modified starches, without modified starch
bg: Без модифицирани нишестета, без модифицирано нишесте
fi: ilman muunneltuja tärkkelyksiä, ilman muunneltua tärkkelystä
fr: Sans amidons modifiés, sans amidon modifié, sans amidons transformés, sans amidon transformé
hu: Módosított keményítők nélkül
it: Senza amidi modificati
pt: Sem amido modificado, sem amidos modificados

en: No gelatin, Without gelatin, Gelatinfree, Gelatin-free
bg: Без желатин, Не съдържа желатин
ca: Sense gelatina
de: Ohne Gelatine, Ohne Gelatin, Gelatinefrei
es: Sin gelatina
fi: gelatiiniton, ei gelatiinia, ilman gelatiinia
fr: Sans gélatine
he: ללא ג׳לטין, נטול ג׳לטין
hr: bez želatine
hu: Zselatinmentes, zselatin nélkül
it: Senza gelatina
nl: Zonder gelatine, Gelatinevrij
pl: Bez żelatyny
pt: Sem gelatina, sem gelatinas

en: no glucose syrup
bg: без глюкозен сироп
ca: sense sirop de glucosa
de: ohne Glukosesirup
es: sin jarabe de glucosa
fi: ei glukoosisiirappia
fr: sans sirop de glucose
he: ללא סירופ גלוקוז
hr: bez sirupa od glukoze
hu: glükóz szirup nélkül
it: senza sciroppo di glucosio
nl: geen glucosestroop
pl: bez syropu glukozowego
pt: sem xarope de glucose

en: no fructose syrup
bg: без фруктозен сироп
ca: sense sirop de fructosa
de: ohne Fruktose-Sirup
es: sin jarabe de fructosa
fi: ei fruktoosisiirappia
fr: sans sirop de fructose
he: ללא סירופ פרוקטוזה
hr: bez sirupa od fruktoze
hu: fruktóz szirup nélkül
it: senza sciroppo di fruttosio
nl: geen fructose siroop
pt: sem xarope de frutose